Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-161.06
State Surplus Property Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the State Surplus Property Revolving Fund. The fund shall be administered by the materiel division of the Department of Administrative Services. The fund shall consist of money collected from the sale of surplus property and fees from such sales and shall be used to reimburse the appropriate funds from the proceeds of such sales and pay for expenses incurred by the division for the sale of the property.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 96.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.